Arkansas, session 2025, SB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-67-206(f) and (g), concerning new
construction projects of the State Highway Commission, are amended to read as
follows:
(f) Successful bidders shall be required to furnish a surety bond or
bonds by a surety company to be approved by the commission, in a penal sum of
at least one-fourth (¼) of the amount of the contract price, conditioned as
the commission may require to ensure that each contract between a bidder and
the commission is fully executed and completed and that the bond or bonds
fully cover the exposure of the state.
(g) However, the commission may accept personal bonds, but in every
case in which a personal bond is accepted, the contractor shall be required
to deposit United States Government bonds, state highway bonds or notes, or
valid bonds of any road improvement district referred to in Acts 1929, No.
65, § 19 [repealed], in an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the
amount of the contract to be held in escrow as collateral security for the
*ZRC014*
02-13-2025 08:57:39 ZRC014

As Engrossed: S2/13/25 SB202
performance of the contract.

/s/Hickey

































02-13-2025 08:57:39 ZRC014